Utah statutes.
61-2-21.   Remedies and action for violations.
(1) (a)  The director shall issue and serve upon a person an order directing
that person to cease and desist from an act if:
(i)  the director has reason to believe that the person has been engaging, is
about to engage, or is engaging in the act constituting a violation of this
chapter; and
(ii)  it appears to the director that it would be in the public interest to
stop the act.
(b)  Within ten days after receiving the order, the person upon whom the order
is served may request a hearing.
(c)  Pending a hearing requested under Subsection (1)(b), a cease and desist
order shall remain in effect.
(d)  If a request for a hearing is made, the division shall follow the
procedures and requirements of Title 63G, Chapter 4, Administrative Procedures
Act.
(2) (a)  After a hearing requested under Subsection (1), if the commission and
the director agree that an act of the person violates this chapter, the
director:
(i)  shall issue an order making the order issued under Subsection (1)
permanent; and
(ii)  may impose another disciplinary action under Section 61-2-12.
(b)  The director shall file suit in the name of the Department of Commerce
and the Division of Real Estate, in the district court in the county in which
an act described in Subsection (1) occurs or where the person resides or
carries on business, to enjoin and restrain the person from violating this
chapter if:
(i) (A) a hearing is not requested under Subsection (1); and
(B)  the person fails to cease the act described in Subsection (1); or
(ii)  after discontinuing the act described in Subsection (1), the person
again commences the act.
(c) A district court of this state has jurisdiction of an action brought under
this section.
(d)  Upon a proper showing in an action brought under this section or upon a
conviction under Section 76-6-1203, the court may:
(i)  issue a permanent or temporary, prohibitory or mandatory injunction;
(ii)  issue a restraining order or writ of mandamus;
(iii)  enter a declaratory judgment;
(iv)  appoint a receiver or conservator for the defendant or the defendant's
assets;
(v)  order disgorgement;
(vi)  order rescission;
(vii)  impose a civil penalty not to exceed the greater of:
(A)  $2,500 for each violation; or
(B)  the amount of any gain or economic benefit derived from a violation; and
(viii)  enter any other relief the court considers just.
(e)  The court may not require the division to post a bond in an action
brought under this Subsection (2).
(3)  Any license or registration issued by the division to any person or
entity convicted of a violation of Section 76-6-1203 is automatically revoked.
(4)  A remedy or action provided in this section does not limit, interfere
with, or prevent the prosecution of another remedy or action, including a
criminal proceeding.
